Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-106.2 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, every public


school shall display in a conspicuous place in each classroom of the


school a durable poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments that


meets the requirements of subsection B of this section.


B. A poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments required by


subsection A of this section shall:


1. Include the text of the Ten Commandments as provided by


subsection C of this section in a size and typeface that is legible

Req. No. 10036 Page 1


to a person with average vision from anywhere in the classroom in


which the poster or framed copy is displayed; and


2. Be at least sixteen (16) inches wide and twenty (20) inches


tall.


C. The text of the poster or framed copy of the Ten


Commandments shall read as follows:


"The Ten Commandments


I AM the LORD thy God.


Thou shalt have no other gods before me.


Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.


Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.


Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.


Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the


land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.


Thou shalt not kill.


Thou shalt not commit adultery.


Thou shalt not steal.


Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.


Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.


Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor


his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy


neighbor's."


D. A public school in which each classroom does not include a


poster or framed copy of the Ten Commandments shall:

Req. No. 10036 Page 2


1. Accept any offer of a privately donated poster or framed


copy of the Ten Commandments provided that the poster or copy:


a. meets the requirements of subsection B of this


section, and


b. does not contain any additional content; and


2. Display the poster or framed copy as required by subsection


A of this section.


E. If a public school has a poster or framed copy of the Ten


Commandments in each classroom that does not meet the requirements


of subsection B of this section, the school may replace them with


privately donated posters or copies that meet the requirements for


display.


F. A public school shall offer a poster or framed copy of the


Ten Commandments required by subsection A of this section in the


school's possession that is not needed for display in a classroom as


a donation to another public school.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-10036 MAH 03/25/26



Req. No. 10036 Page 3